nb: Materiale for kuleblære: Butyl; Lateks; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Syntetisk; Annet
el: Υλικό αεροθαλάμου μπάλας: Βουτύλιο; Λάτεξ; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Καουτσούκ; Συνθετικό; Άλλο
pt-PT: Material da câmara de ar da bola: Butilo; Látex; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Sintético; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal mjehura lopte: Butil; Lateks; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Sintetika; Ostalo
sk-SK: Materiál guľového mechu: Butyl; Latex; Polyuretán (PU); Guma; Syntetika; Iný
ko: 공 블래더 소재: 부틸; 라텍스; 폴리우레탄(PU); 고무; 합성 소재; 기타
zh-CN: 球体内胆材质: 丁基橡胶; 乳胶; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡胶; 合成材料; 其他
fi: Käsipallon sisäkumin materiaali: Butyyli; Lateksi; Polyuretaani (PU); Kumi; Synteettinen; Muu
de: Material der Ballblase: Butyl; Latex; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Synthetik; Sonstige
it: Materiale della vescica: Butile; Lattice; Poliuretano (PU); Gomma; Sintetico; Altro
ru: Материал внутренней камеры мяча: Бутил; Латекс; Полиуретан (PU); Резина; Синтетика; Другое
sv: Material för klotets insida: Butyl; Latex; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Syntet; Övrigt
nl: Balblaas materiaal: Butyl; Latex; Polyurethaan (PU); Rubber; Synthetisch; Overig
hu: Labdabelső anyaga: Butil; Latex; Poliuretán (PU); Gumi; Szintetikus; Egyéb
pt-BR: Material da câmara de ar da bola: Butil; Látex; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Sintético; Outro
ja: ボールブラダー素材: ブチル; ラテックス; ポリウレタン (PU); ラバー; 合成素材; その他
th: วัสดุยางในลูกบอล: บิวทิล; ลาเท็กซ์; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); ยาง; วัสดุสังเคราะห์; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Kamuolio kameros medžiaga: Butilas; Lateksas; Poliuretanas (PU); Guma; Sintetika; Kita
zh-TW: 球囊材質: 丁基橡膠; 乳膠; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡膠; 合成材質; 其他
tr: Top iç kesesi malzemesi: Bütil; Lateks; Poliüretan (PU); Kauçuk; Sentetik; Diğer
pl: Materiał pęcherza piłki: Butyl; Lateks; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Materiał syntetyczny; Inne
ro-RO: Materialul camerei mingii: Butil; Latex; Poliuretan (PU); Cauciuc; Sintetic; Altele
sl-SI: Material meha žoge: Butil; Lateks; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Sintetika; Drugo
da: Boldblæremateriale: Butyl; Latex; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Syntetisk; Andet
en: Ball bladder material: Butyl; Latex; Polyurethane (PU); Rubber; Synthetic; Other
es: Material de la vejiga del balón: Butilo; Látex; Poliuretano (PU); Goma; Sintético; Otro
bg-BG: Материал на вътрешната камера на топката: Бутил; Латекс; Полиуретан (PU); Гума; Синтетика; Друго
fr: Matériau de la vessie du ballon: Butyle; Latex; Polyuréthane (PU); Caoutchouc; Synthétique; Autre
cs: Materiál duše míče: Butyl; Latex; Polyuretan (PU); Guma; Syntetika; Jiné
vi: Chất liệu ruột bóng: Butyl; Latex; Polyurethane (PU); Cao su; Chất liệu tổng hợp; Khác